en: Duck fat
bg: Патешка мазнина
de: Entenfette
fr: Graisse de canard, gras de canard
hr: Pačja mast
hu: Kacsa zsír
it: Grasso d'anatra
lt: Ančių taukai
nl: Eendenvetten
pt: Gorduras de pato

en: Lards, Lard fat
de: Schmalz, Schmalze
fr: Saindoux
hr: Svinjske masti
it: Lardo
ja: ラード
lt: Taukai
nl: Varkensreuzels
pl: Smalec

en: Pork fat
bg: Свинска мас
fr: Lard gras
hr: Svinjska mast
lt: Kiaulienos taukai

en: Goose fats
de: Gänsefette
fr: Graisse d'oie, gras d'oie, graisse d'oies, gras d'oies
hr: Guščje masti
hu: Liba zsírok
lt: Žasų taukai
nl: Ganzenvetten

en: Turkey fat
bg: Пуешка мас
fr: Graisse de dinde
hr: Pureća mast
nl: Kalkoenvetten

en: Fish oils
de: Fischöle
fr: Huiles de poissons
hr: Riblja ulja
hu: Hal olaj
it: Olio di pesce
ja: 魚油
lt: Žuvų taukai
nl: Visoliën
zh: 鱼油

en: Butter fat
de: Butterfett
fr: Matière grasse de beurre, matière grasse butyrique, graisse butyrique
hr: Maslac od maslaca
it: Grasso di burro
nl: Botervetten
pt: Gorduras de manteiga
zh: 黄油脂肪

en: Clarified butter
fr: Beurre clarifié, beurres clarifiés

en: ghee
ar: سمن حيواني
az: sarı yağ
bg: гхи
bn: ঘি
cs: ghí
da: ghee
de: ghee
dv: ދަހީ
eo: gio
es: ghee
fa: روغن کرمانشاهی
fi: ghi, ghee
fr: ghi, ghee
ga: gí
gu: ઘી
he: גהי
hi: घी
hr: ghee
hu: ghí, ghí vaj
id: minyak samin
is: skírt smjör
it: ghi
ja: ギー
ka: ერბო
kn: ತುಪ್ಪ
ko: 기
lt: ghi
ml: നെയ്യ്
mr: तूप
ms: minyak sapi
nb: ghi, ghee
ne: घिउ
nl: ghee, ghi
nn: ghi, ghee
pa: ਘਿਉ
pl: ghi, ghee
pt: ghi, ghee
ro: ghee
ru: Гхи
sa: घृतम्
si: ගිතෙල්
sl: ghee
sv: ghee
ta: நெய்
te: నెయ్యి
uk: Ґгі, Гхі, Ґі
ur: گھی
zh: 酥油

en: Hydrogenated vegetable oil
fr: Huiles végétales hydrogénées, huile végétale hydrogénée

en: Vanaspati
fr: Vanaspati

en: Dry butter
fr: Beurre de tourage

en: Sardine oils
fr: Huiles de sardine

en: Salmon oils
ar: زيوت السالمون
az: Ləziz yağlar
bg: сьомгови масла
bn: স্যালমন তেল
cs: lososové oleje
da: laksolie
de: Lachsöle
dv: ސަލްމޮން ކަންތައް
eo: salmaj oleoj
es: aceites de salmón
fa: روغن ماهی سالمون
fi: lohiöljyt
fr: Huiles de saumon
ga: olaí salmóin
gu: સેલ્મન તેલો
he: שמנת דג הסלמון
hi: सैलमन तेल
hr: lososovo ulje
hu: lazacolajok
id: minyak salmon
is: laxolía
it: oli di salmone
ja: サーモンオイル
ka: ლახის ზეთები
kn: ಸಾಮನ್ ಎಣ್ಣೆಗಳು
ko: 연어 오일
lt: lososų aliejus
ml: സാൽമൺ എണ്ണ
mr: सॅल्मन तेल
ms: minyak salmon
nb: lakseoljer
ne: साल्मन तेल
nl: zalmoliën
nn: lakseoljer
pa: ਸਾਲਮਨ ਤੇਲ
pl: oleje z łososia
pt: óleos de salmão
ro: uleiuri de somon
ru: лососевые масла
sa: साल्मन तेल
si: සැල්මන් තෙල්
sl: lososova olja
sv: laxoljor
ta: சால்மன் எண்ணெய்
te: సాల్మన్ ఆయిల్స్
uk: лососеві масла
ur: سیلمن تیل
zh: 鲑鱼油

en: Herring oils
ar: زيوت السردين
az: Herinq yağları
bg: херингови масла
bn: হেরিং তেল
cs: sleďové oleje
da: sildolie
de: Heringöle
dv: ހެރިންގެ ކަންތައް
eo: heringaj oleoj
es: aceites de arenque
fa: روغن ماهی هرینگ
fi: heringin öljyt
fr: Huiles de hareng
ga: olaí hering
gu: હેરિંગ તેલો
he: שמנת דג הרינג
hi: हेरिंग तेल
hr: ulja od haringe
hu: heringolajok
id: minyak ikan hering
is: sildarolía
it: oli di aringa
ja: ニシン油
ka: ხილის ზეთები
kn: ಹೆರಿಂಗ್ ಎಣ್ಣೆಗಳು
ko: 청어 오일
lt: šprotų aliejus
ml: ഹെറിങ് എണ്ണ
mr: हेरिंग तेल
ms: minyak ikan sardin
nb: sildolje
ne: हेरिङ तेल
nl: haringoliën
nn: sildolje
pa: ਹੇਰਿੰਗ ਤੇਲ
pl: oleje śledziowe
pt: óleos de arenque
ro: uleiuri de hering
ru: сельдяные масла
sa: हेरिङ्ग तेलानि
si: හැරිං තෙල්
sl: olja iz sleda
sv: silloljor
ta: மீன் எண்ணெய்
te: హెరింగ్ ఆయిల్స్
uk: селедкові масла
ur: ہیرنگ تیل
zh: 鲱鱼油

en: Codliver fats, codliver oils, Cod liver oils
fr: Huiles de foie de cabillaud, Huiles de foie de morue
hr: Masti bakalara
it: Olio di fegato di merluzzo
lt: Menkių kepenų aliejus
nl: Kabeljauwleveroliën
zh: 鱼肝油脂肪

en: Vegetable fats, Plant-based fats
bg: Растителни мазнини
ca: Greixos vegetals
cs: Rostlinné tuky
da: Vegetabilske fedtstoffer, plantebaserede fedtstoffer
de: Pflanzenfette, Pflanzliche Fette
es: Grasas vegetales, Grasas de origen vegetal
fi: kasvirasvat
fr: Matières grasses végétales, matière grasse végétale, graisses végétales
he: שומנים מן הצומח
hr: Biljne masti
hu: Növényi zsírok, növényi eredetű zsírok
it: Grassi vegetali, grassi di origine vegetale
ja: 植物性油脂
lt: Augaliniai riebalai
nl: Plantaardige vetten
pl: Tłuszcze roślinne
pt: Gorduras vegetals
ru: Растительные жиры, Жиры растительные
sv: Vegetabiliska fetter
th: ไขมันจากพืช
tr: Bitkisel yağ
zh: 蔬菜脂肪

en: Spreadable vegetable fats
sv: Smörbara vegetabiliska matfetter

en: Cocoa butter
bg: Какаово масло
de: Kakaobutter
es: Mantecas de cacao
fr: Beurres de cacao
hr: Kakao maslac
it: Burro di cacao
ja: ココアバター, カカオバター
lt: Kakavos sviestas
nl: Cacaoboters
pt: Manteigas de cacau

en: Margarines
bg: Маргарин
ca: Margarina
da: Margariner
de: Margarinen, Margarine
es: Margarinas
fi: margariinit
fr: Margarines
he: מרגרינות
hr: margarin
hu: Margarinok
it: Margarina
ja: マーガリン
lt: Margarinai
nb: Margariner
nl: Margarines
nn: Margarinar
pl: Margaryny, margaryna
pt: Margarinas
sv: Margariner